North Carolina, session 2025, HB288.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 144 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 144-10. Display of POW/MIA flag.
The official "Prisoner of War/Missing in Action (POW/MIA)" flag shall be displayed and
flown over all State-owned buildings and at all public school buildings whenever the United
States flag is displayed if the POW/MIA flag can be attached to an existing flagpole. The
POW/MIA flag shall be of suitable size and material and shall be displayed and flown in
accordance with the appropriate policies and procedures concerning the display of the State and
United States flags. This section does not apply to the POW/MIA flag flown over the State
Capitol, which is flown pursuant to G.S. 143-345.9.
The State shall purchase POW/MIA flags for State-owned buildings in the same manner as
the North Carolina flag is purchased. Local boards of education may accept donations of the
POW/MIA flag or shall purchase flags with available funds."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H288-v-1*